Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4237.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MARY MURPHY HOME, MUSEUM, AND PARK.new text end new text begin $250,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the governing board of the Minnesota Historical Society for a grant to the city of Hermantown to preserve and renovate the State Representative Mary Murphy home, museum, and park. new text end